src/fst/stems/nouns_newwords.lexc
!waq̓waq̓+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}waq̓waq̓ N_with-PL_RED2 "frog" ;
!waq̓waq̓us+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}waq̓waq̓us N_with-PL_RED2 "March" ;
!x̌ald+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌ald N_with-PL_RED2 "chiton (small)" ;
!x̌ald+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌ald N_with-PL_RED2 "chiton" ;
!x̌ax̌aʔ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌ax̌aʔ N_with-PL_RED2 "week" ;
!x̌aʔx̌alus+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌aʔx̌alus N_with-PL_RED2 "raccoon" ;
!x̌aʔx̌aʔəɬdat+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌aʔx̌aʔəɬdat N_with-PL_RED2 "Sunday" ;
!x̌qp̓ucid+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌qp̓ucid N_with-PL_RED2 "knee" ;
!x̌qp̓ucid+N:x̌√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}qp̓ucid N_with-PL_RED2 "knee" ;
!x̌ədx̌əd+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌ədx̌əd N_with-PL_RED2 "goose" ;
!xʷč̓iɬqs+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}xʷč̓iɬqs N_with-PL_RED2 "large native oyster" ;
!x̌ʷəlč+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌ʷəlč N_with-PL_RED2 "bay|ocean" ;
!yubəč+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}yubəč N_with-PL_RED2 "king salmon" ;
!yəlab+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}yəlab N_with-PL_RED2 "either parent's sibling of either sex when parent is deceased" ;
!yəw̓yəɬdaʔ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}yəw̓yəɬdaʔ N_with-PL_RED2 "fawn" ;
!yəx̌ʷəlaʔ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}yəx̌ʷəlaʔ N_with-PL_RED2 "eagle" ;

!ɬalap+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ɬalap N_with-PL_RED2 "tongue" ;
!ʔalʔal+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ʔalʔal N_with-PL_RED2 "house" ;
!ɬaləp̓+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ɬaləp̓   N_with-PL_RED2 "tongue/ ɬalap" ;
!čaləs+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}čaləs N_with-PL_RED2 "hand" ;
!čaləš+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}čaləš N_with-PL_RED2 "hand" ;
!ʔaləšək+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ʔaləšək N_with-PL_RED2 "turtle" ;
!ɬaʔx̌+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ɬaʔx̌ N_with-PL_RED2 "plate" ;
!ʔiišəd+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ʔiišəd N_with-PL_RED2 "family" ;
!ʔik̓ʷusəd+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ʔik̓ʷusəd N_with-PL_RED2 "napkin" ;
!ʔukʷs+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ʔukʷs N_with-PL_RED2 "chiton (large)" ;
!šukʷə+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}šukʷə N_with-PL_RED2 "sugar" ;
!č̓awəyʔulč+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}č̓awəyʔulč N_with-PL_RED2 "glass" ;
!ƛ̕aƛ̕ac̓apəd+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ƛ̕aƛ̕ac̓apəd N_with-PL_RED2 "ant" ;
!ƛ̕aɬəb+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ƛ̕aɬəb N_with-PL_RED2 "salt" ;
!ƛ̕iq̓s+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ƛ̕iq̓s N_with-PL_RED2 "January" ;
!č̓itabac+v1+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}č̓itabac N_with-PL_RED2 "Saturday" ;
!č̓itabac+v2+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}č̓itabəc N_with-PL_RED2 "Saturday" ;
!č̓ič̓əlpyaqid+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}č̓ič̓əlpyaqid N_with-PL_RED2 "periwinkle" ;
!ʔəpus+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ʔəpus N_with-PL_RED2 "aunt" ;
!ƛ̕ux̌ʷƛ̕ux̌ʷ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ƛ̕ux̌ʷƛ̕ux̌ʷ N_with-PL_RED2 "oyster" ;
!ƛ̕xʷayʔ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ƛ̕xʷayʔ N_with-PL_RED2 "dog salmon|chum salmon" ;
!čəxʷəluʔ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}čəxʷəluʔ N_with-PL_RED2 "grey whale" ;
!ǰəšəd+N:ǰə√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}šəd N_with-PL_RED2 "foot" ;


haʔkʷ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}haʔkʷ N_with-PL_RED2 "long time" ;
sləx̌il+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ləx̌il N_with-PL_RED2 "daylight" ;
swatixʷtəd+N:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}watixʷtəd N_with-PL_RED2 "land" ;
qawq̓s+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}qawq̓s N_with-PL_RED2 "raven" ;
ƛ̕əlayʔ+N:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ƛ̕əlayʔ N_with-PL_RED2 "canoe" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
